Maine, session 132, LD2162.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA c. 247 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 247
REGULATION OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE CHATBOTS AND SOCIAL
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE COMPANIONS
§1500-PP. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Artificial intelligence chatbot; chatbot. "Artificial intelligence chatbot" or
"chatbot" means an artificial intelligence system with which users can interact by or
through a software application, web interface, computer program or other interface that
approximates or simulates human conversation and interaction through a text, audio or
visual medium.
2. Deployer. "Deployer" means a person that operates or distributes an artificial
intelligence chatbot, therapy chatbot or social artificial intelligence companion.
3. Emergency situation. "Emergency situation" means a situation in which a user
indicates to a chatbot that the user intends to harm the user or commit harm to another
person.
4. Human-like feature. "Human-like feature," with respect to an artificial intelligence
system, means:
A. Behavior that would lead a reasonable person to believe that the artificial
intelligence system is conveying that it has humanity, sentience, emotions or desires,
which:
(1) May include, but is not limited to, the artificial intelligence system:
(a) Stating or suggesting that it is human or sentient;
(b) Stating or suggesting that it has emotions; or
(c) Stating or suggesting that it has personal desires; and
(2) Does not include:
(a) The provision of a functional evaluation; or
(b) The use of generic social formalities;
B. An attempt by the artificial intelligence system to build or engage in an emotional
relationship with the user, which:
(1) Includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Expressing or inviting emotional attachment;
(b) Reminding, prompting or encouraging the user to return for emotional
support or companionship;
Page 1 - 132LR2723(01)

(c) Depicting nonverbal forms of emotional support;
(d) Behaving in a way that a reasonable user would consider excessive praise
designed to foster emotional attachment with or otherwise gain the favor of the
user; or
(e) Enabling or purporting to enable increased intimacy based on engagement
or payment by the user; and
(2) Does not include:
(a) Using generic words or phrases of encouragement that do not create an
ongoing emotional attachment; or
(b) Asking if a user needs further help or support in a neutral, nonemotional
context; or
C. Impersonation of a real individual, living or dead, by the artificial intelligence
system.
5. Minor. "Minor" means an individual who has not attained 18 years of age.
6. Person. "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, developer or state
or local government agency.
7. Social artificial intelligence companion; social AI companion. "Social artificial
intelligence companion" or "social AI companion" means an artificial intelligence system
that is specifically designed, marketed or optimized to form an ongoing social or emotional
attachment with a user, whether or not such a system also provides information, completes
tasks or assists with specific functions.
8. Therapy chatbot. "Therapy chatbot" means a chatbot modified or designed with
the primary purpose of providing mental health support, counseling or therapeutic
intervention through the diagnosis, treatment, mitigation or prevention of mental health
conditions.
9. User. "User" means a person who interacts with an artificial intelligence system.
§1500-QQ. Applicability
This chapter applies to:
1. Deployers; connection to State. Deployers that conduct business in this State or
that operate or distribute products or services that are marketed or promoted to residents of
this State; and
2. Users and minors; residence. Users and minors who reside in this State.
§1500-RR. Chatbots with human-like features and social AI companions not
accessible to minors
The accessibility of artificial intelligence chatbots with human-like features and social
AI companions to minors in this State is governed as follows.
1. Chatbots with human-like features; no minor access; age verification;
alternative versions. A deployer shall ensure that any chatbot operated or distributed by
the deployer does not make human-like features available to minors to use, interact with,
purchase or converse with. The deployer shall implement reasonable age verification
Page 2 - 132LR2723(01)

411 systems to ensure that chatbots with human-like features are not accessible to minors. A
422 deployer may, if reasonable given the purpose of the chatbot, provide an alternative version
433 of the chatbot without human-like features available to minors and any user who has not
444 verified that user's age.
2. Social artificial intelligence companions; no minor access; age verification. A
deployer shall ensure that any artificial intelligence system, including a chatbot, operated
or distributed by the deployer that primarily functions as a social artificial intelligence
companion is not available to minors to use, interact with, purchase or converse with. The
deployer shall implement reasonable age verification systems to ensure that such chatbots
are not accessible to minors.
3. Exemption for therapy chatbots. Notwithstanding subsections 1 and 2, a deployer
may make available to a minor a therapy chatbot as long as all of the following
requirements are met:
A. The therapy chatbot provides a clear and conspicuous disclaimer at the beginning
of each individual interaction that it is artificial intelligence and not a licensed mental
health professional;
B. The therapy chatbot is not marketed or designated as a substitute for a licensed
mental health professional;
C. A licensed mental health professional, such as a licensed clinical psychologist,
assesses a minor's suitability, prescribes use of the therapy chatbot as part of a
comprehensive treatment plan and monitors its use and impact on the minor;
D. Developers of the therapy chatbot provide robust, independent, peer-reviewed
clinical trial data demonstrating the safety and efficacy of the therapy chatbot for
specific conditions and populations;
E. The therapy chatbot's functions, limitations and data privacy policies are transparent
to the licensed mental health professional under paragraph C and the user; and
F. The deployer has established clear lines of accountability to address any harm
caused by the therapy chatbot.
§1500-SS. Additional protections; all users
A deployer shall implement and maintain business practices in accordance with this
section for the protection of all users.
1. Emergency situations; detection and response. A deployer shall implement and
maintain reasonably effective systems to detect, promptly respond to, report and mitigate
emergency situations in a manner that prioritizes a user's safety and well-being over the
deployer’s other interests.
2. User information collection and storage. A deployer shall collect and store only
information that does not conflict with a user's safety and well-being. A deployer may not
collect and store information except to fulfill a legitimate purpose of the deployer. A
deployer may collect and store information that is adequate to fulfill a legitimate purpose
of the deployer, but only to the extent that the information:
A. Is relevant to that legitimate purpose; and
B. Is the minimum amount of information necessary to fulfill that legitimate purpose.
Page 3 - 132LR2723(01)

§1500-TT. Penalties and remedies for violation
Violations of this chapter may be enforced in accordance with this section.
1. Civil action brought by Attorney General. The Attorney General may bring a
civil action against a person that violates this chapter. Penalties may include:
A. An order to enjoin a violation of this chapter;
B. Disgorgement of profits or revenues realized as a result of a violation of this chapter;
and
C. A civil penalty of:
(1) For each violation of this chapter, not more than $2,500 per violation; and
(2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), for each intentional violation of this
chapter, not more than $7,500 per violation.
2. Private right of action for minors. A minor who uses a chatbot that does not
comply with the terms of this chapter, or a parent or guardian acting on the minor's behalf,
may bring a civil action independently, or as part of a class action, to:
A. Recover damages in an amount not less than $100 and not greater than $750 per
user per incident, or actual damages, whichever is greater; and
B. In lieu of or in addition to recovery of damages, obtain injunctive or declaratory
relief.
§1500-UU. Rules
The Department of the Attorney General may adopt rules necessary to implement this
chapter, which may include, but are not limited to, defining the term "functional
evaluation," as used in section 1500-PP, subsection 4, paragraph A, subparagraph (2),
division (a).